Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-728
Judge or justice; own discipline, removal, or retirement; participation prohibited.

No Justice or judge of the Supreme Court or other judge shall participate, as a member of the Commission on Judicial Qualifications, or as a master, or as a member of the Supreme Court, in any proceedings involving his or her own reprimand, discipline, censure, suspension, removal, or retirement.

Laws 1967, c. 141, § 14, p. 434;

Laws 1981, LB 475, § 14.